New York, session 2025-2026, S6036.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2590-b of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. (a) There shall be a city-wide council for district seventy-five 4 created pursuant to this section. The city-wide council for district 5 seventy-five shall consist of eleven voting members and one non-voting 6 member, as follows: 7 (i) nine voting members who shall be parents of students receiving 8 city-wide special education services in district seventy-five to be 9 selected by parents of students who receive such services pursuant to a 10 representative process developed by the chancellor. Such members shall 11 serve a two year term; 12 (ii) two voting members appointed by the public advocate of the city 13 of New York, who shall be individuals with extensive experience and 14 knowledge in the areas of educating, training or employing individuals 15 with handicapping conditions and will make a significant contribution to 16 improving special education in the city district. Such members shall 17 serve a two year term; and 18 (iii) one non-voting member who is a high school senior within 19 district seventy-five appointed by the administrator designated by the 20 chancellor to supervise special education programs. Such member shall 21 serve a one year term. 22 (b) The city-wide council for district seventy-five shall have the 23 power to: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07039-01-5 S. 6036 2 1 (i) advise and comment on any educational or instructional policy 2 involving the provision of district seventy-five services; 3 (ii) issue an annual report on the effectiveness of the city district 4 in providing services to district seventy-five students and making 5 recommendations, as appropriate, on how to improve the efficiency and 6 delivery of such services; and 7 (iii) hold at least one meeting per month open to the public and 8 during which the public may discuss issues facing district seventy-five 9 students. 10 (c) Vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term by the city-wide 11 council for district seventy-five, pursuant to a process developed by 12 the chancellor that shall include consultation with district seventy- 13 five parents; provided however, that where a vacancy occurs in a posi- 14 tion appointed by the public advocate, the public advocate shall appoint 15 a member to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 17 the amendments to section 2590-b of the education law made by section 18 one of this act shall not affect the expiration of such section and 19 shall be deemed repealed therewith.